apertium-ibo.ibo.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Igbo

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>  ! Noun
%<pl%> ! Plural
%<sg%> ! Singular
%<v%>

%<inf%>
%<prc%>

%{A%}   ! a or e

%[%+A%] !
%[%+i%]
%[%+inf%]
%[%+prc%]

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

Pronouns ;

Prefixes ;

Numerals;

Prepositions;

Adjectives;

Adverbs;

Conjuction;

Determiner;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N1

%<n%>:  # ; 

LEXICON PRN

%<prn%>: # ;

LEXICON V

%<v%>%<inf%>%[%+inf%]: # ;
%<v%>%<prc%>%[%+prc%]: # ;

LEXICON ADJ

%<adj%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON PREP

%<pr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: # ;


LEXICON CNJSUB

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CNJCOO

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON DET

%<det%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Prefixes

%[%+A%]:%{A%}%> Verbs ; 
%[%+i%]:i%>     Verbs ; 
                Verbs ; 


!=============!
 LEXICON Nouns
!=============!

abali:abali N1 ; ! "night"
abu:abu N1 ; ! "song"
achịcha:achịcha N1 ; ! "bread"
afa:afa N1 ; ! "name"
afịa:afịa N1 ; ! "market"
afo:afo N1 ; ! "stomach"
agba:agba N1 ; ! "jaw"
agbọ:agbọ N1 ; ! "bond"
ago:ago N1 ; ! "defense"
agu:agu N1 ; ! "tiger"
agwa:agwa N1 ; ! "character"
ahịa:ahịa N1 ; ! "market"
ahihia:ahihia N1 ; ! "grass"
ahu:ahu N1 ; ! "body"
aji:aji N1 ; ! "wool"
ajuju:ajuju N1 ; ! "question"
aka:aka N1 ; ! "hand"
akpa:akpa N1 ; ! "bag"
akpi:akpi N1 ; ! "scorpion"
akpu:akpu N1 ; ! "knob"
akpụkpọ:akpụkpọ N1 ; ! "shoes"
akwa:akwa N1 ; ! "cloth"
akwụkwọ:akwụkwọ N1 ; ! "book"
ala:ala N1 ; ! "earth"
alaka:alaka N1 ; ! "branch"
amadi:amadi N1 ; ! "gentleman"
anụ:anụ N1 ; ! "meat"
anụmanụ:anụmanụ ; ! "animal"
anya:anya N1 ; ! "eye, eyes"
isi:isi N1 ; ! "isi"
arọ:arọ N1 ; ! "arrow"
aturu:aturu N1 ; ! "sheep"
azu:azu N1 ; ! "fish"
bọta:bọta N1 ; ! "butter"
chiiz:chiiz N1 ; ! "cheese"
di:di N1 ; ! "husband"
ẹbẹ:ẹbẹ N1 ; ! "apology"
ebo:ebo N1 ; ! "tribe"
echebe:echebe N1 ; ! "protection"
ehi:ehi N1 ; ! "cow"
enyì:enyì N1 ; ! "friend"
eze:eze N1 ; ! "king"
Ifẹ:Ifẹ N1 ; ! "love"
igba:igba N1 ; ! "season"
ihu-igwe:ihu-igwe N1 ; ! "weather"
ihu:ihu N1 ; ! "face"
ihunaanya:ihunaanya N1 ; ! "love"
íjè:íjè N1 ; ! "movement"
ijèọma:ijèọma N1 ; ! "farewell"
ikuku:ikuku N1 ; ! "air"
imi:imi N1 ; ! "nose"
ịnyịnya:ịnyịnya N1 ; ! "horse"
ire:ire N1 ; ! "tongue"
iro:iro N1 ; ! "enemy"
iru:iru N1 ; ! "security"
isi:isi N1 ; ! "odor"
ite:ite N1 ; ! "pot"
iyi:iyi N1 ; ! "stream"
kọfị:kọfị N1 ; ! "coffee"
mbà:mbà N1 ; ! "depression"
mbido:mbido N1 ; ! "origin"
mkpisi:mkpisi N1 ; ! "stick"
mkpụrụ:mkpụrụ N1 ; ! "fruit"
mma:mma N1 ; ! "quality"
mmechị:mmechị N1 ; ! "conclusion"
mmiri:mmiri N1 ; ! "water"
ndụ:ndụ N1 ; ! "life"
ndụdụ:ndụdụ N1 ; ! "fork"
ngaji:ngaji N1 ; ! "spoon"
nkịta:nkịta N1 ; ! "dog"
nku:nku N1 ; ! "wood"
nnà:nnà N1 ; ! "father"
nne:nne N1 ; ! "mother"
ńnú:ńnú N1 ; ! "salt"
nri:nri N1 ; ! "food"
nsogbu:nsogbu N1 ; ! "problem"
ntị:ntị N1 ; ! "listen"
ntụ:ntụ N1 ; ! "flour"na
ntutu:ntutu N1 ; ! "hair"
nwa:nwa N1 ; ! "son"
nwanyi:nwanyi N1 ; ! "woman"
nwoke:nwoke N1 ; ! "man"
obara:obara N1 ; ! "blood"
obi:obi N1 ; ! "heart"
obianuohia:obianuohia N1 ; ! "park"
obodo:obodo N1 ; ! "city"
oche:oche N1 ; ! "seat"
ọdọ:ọdọ N1 ; ! "lake"
ọdụm:ọdụm N1 ; ! "lion"
ohia:ohia N1 ; ! "forest"
ọka:ọka N1 ; ! "corn"
oké:oké N1 ; ! "border"
okpara:okpara N1 ; ! "son"
okpu:okpu N1 ; ! "hat"
okpueze:okpueze N1 ; ! "crown"
ọkụ:ọkụ N1 ; ! "fire"
ọkụkọ:ọkụkọ N1 ; ! "chicken"
ọkụkụ:ọkụkụ N1 ; ! "plant"
ọlụ:ọlụ N1 ; ! "neck"
ọma:ọma N1 ; ! "well"
ọnụ:ọnụ N1 ; ! "together"
onwa:onwa N1 ; ! "month"
osimiri:osimiri N1 ; ! "sea"
osísí:osísí N1 ; ! "tree"
sanwich:sanwich N1 ; ! "sandwich"
taa:taa N1 ; ! "tar"
ube:ube N1 ; ! "spear"
ubi:ubi N1 ; ! "field"
uchichi:uchichi N1 ; ! "night"
ufereoyi:ufereoyi N1 ; ! "wind"
ugbo:ugbo N1 ; ! "vehicle"
ugwu:ugwu N1 ; ! "mountain"
ukwu:ukwu N1 ; ! "foot"
ụlọ:ụlọ N1 ; ! "house"
ụra:ụra N1 ; ! "sleep"
na-ehi-ụra:na-ehi-ụra ; ! "sleeping"
urupuru:urupuru N1 ; ! "cloud"
usoro:usoro N1 ; ! "format"
ututu:ututu N1 ; ! "morning"
ụwa:ụwa N1 ; ! "world"
uwe:uwe N1 ; ! "shirt"
ụzọ:ụzọ N1 ; ! "way"
ogige:ogige N1 ; ! "garden"
nne:nne N1 ; ! "mother"
egwuregwu:egwuregwu N1 ; ! "game"
windo:windo N1 ; ! "window"
ụmụaka:ụmụaka ; ! "children"
n'ime:n'ime ; ! "inside"
tebụl:tebụl ; ! "table, tables"
oche:oche ; ! "chair, chairs"
nnụnụ:nnụnụ ; ! "bird, birds"
nwa-nwoke:nwa-nwoke ; ! "boy"
nwa-agbọghọ:nwa-agbọghọ ; ! "girl"
nwanne-nwaanyi:nwanne-nwaanyi ; ! "sister"
ndị-mmadụ:ndị-mmadụ ; ! "people"

!================!
 LEXICON pronouns
!================!
gini:gini PRN ; ! "what"
onye:onye PRN ; ! "who"
m:m PRN ; ! "I, me"
gị:gị ; ! "you"
ọ:ọ PRN ; ! "she, he"
ya:ya PRN ; ! "it"
anyị:anyị ; ! "we, us"
ihe:ihe ; ! "somthing"
ụfọdụ:ụfọdụ ; ! "some"
ha-abụọ:ha-abụọ ; ! "both"
ọzọ:ọzọ ; ! "another"
ha:ha ; ! "they"
nkaa:nkaa ; ! "that"
ihe-obula:ihe-obula ; ! "everything, anything"


!=============!
 LEXICON Verbs
!=============!

iri:ri V ; ! "eat"
ibi:bi V ; ! "live"
iga:ga V ; ! "walk"
agaghari:agaghari V ; ! "walks"
ogige:ogige V ; ! "garden"
azịza:azịza ; ! "answer"
ajụjụ:ajụjụ V ; ! "question"
nọ:nọ  V ; ! "is, are"
chọta:chọta ; ! "find"
chọtara:chọtara V ; ! "found"
ga:ga V ; ! "must"
ibụ:bụ V ; ! "be"
idi:di V ; ! "be"
nwere:nwere V ; ! "have, has"
imẹ:mẹ V ; ! "make"
isi:si V ; ! "say"
kwuoo:kwuoo V ; ! "says"
ijẹ:jẹ V ; ! "go"
gara:gara V ; ! "went"
ima:ma V ; ! "know"
maara:maara V ; ! "knows"
ifụ:fụ V ; ! "see"
ibia:bia V ; ! "come"
ichẹ:chẹ V ; ! "think"
chee:chee V ; ! "thinks"
inẹ:nẹ V ; ! "look"
lee-anya:lee-anya ; ! "looks"
choo:choo V ; ! "want"
inyẹ:nyẹ V ; ! "give"
iji:ji V ; ! "use"
igwa:gwa V ; ! "tell"
ijụ:jụ V ; ! "ask"
ilu:lu V ; ! "work"
irapụ:rapụ V ; ! "leave"
ikpọ:kpọ V ; ! "call"
ichu:chu V ; ! "chase"
ide:de V ; ! "write"
igafe:gafe V ; ! "pass"
igba:gba V ; ! "dance"
igbachi:gbachi V ; ! "lock"
icheta:cheta V ; ! "remember"
ikagbu:kagbu V ; ! "cancel"
inodu:nodu V ; ! "sit"
itu:tu V ; ! "throw" 
eme:me V ; ! "does, doing"
ime:me V ; ! "do"
mere:mere V ; ! "did"
inwa:nwa V ; ! "try"
iwo:wo V ; ! "become"
ibido:bido V ; ! "begin"
ezigbo:ezigbo  V ; ! "very"
ụda:ụda V ; ! "sound"
nwere-ike:nwere-ike ; ! "can"
oge:oge ; ! "time"
ṅụọ:ṅụọ ; ! "drink"
achị-ọchị:achị-ọchị ; ! "laughs"
inu:inu ; ! "hear"
gee-nti:gee-nti ; ! "listens, listen"
zaghachi:zaghachi ; ! "replies"
hụrụ:hụrụ ; ! "seen"
igwu-egwu:igwu-egwu ; ! "play"
gbaaoso:gbaaoso ; ! "runs"
ezo:ezo ; ! "hiding"
kwuo:kwuo ; ! "speak"
nweta:nweta ; ! "get, gets"
enweghị-ike:enweghị-ike ; ! "can't, cannot"
ọdụ:ọdụ V ; ! "sitting"
ọnọ-ọgụgụ:ọnọ-ọgụgụ ; ! "counting"
ihu-n'anya:ihu-n'anya ; ! "love"
mmasị:mmasị ; ! "likes"


!=================!
 LEXICON Adjectives
!=================!

öma:öma ADJ ; ! "good, beautiful"
öcha:öcha ADJ ; ! "white, clean"
oji:oji	ADJ ; ! "black"
öjöö:öjöö ADJ ; ! "ugly, bad"
ukwu:ukwu ADJ ; ! "big"
obele:obele ADJ ; ! "small"
niile:niile ADJ ; ! "all, each, every"
dum:dum	ADJ ; ! "all, each, every"
n'èzí:n'èzí ADJ ; ! "outside"
n'azụ:n'azụ ADJ ; ! "behind"
mma:mma ADJ ; ! "nice"
nnukwu:nnukwu ADJ ; ! "big"
obere:obere ADJ ; ! "small"
ochie:ochie ADJ ; ! "old"
nwatakịrị:nwatakịrị ADJ ; ! "little"
oyi:oyi ADJ ; ! "cold"
mechara:mechara ADJ ; ! "finished"
nyocha:nyocha ADJ ; ! "searching"
na-anwa:na-anwa ADJ ; ! "trying"
obi-ụtọ:obi-ụtọ ; ! "happy"
abia:abia ; ! "coming"
ọkụ:ọkụ; ! "warm, hot"
nke-ha:nke-ha ; ! "theirs"
nso:nso ; ! "closer"


!===================!
 LEXICON Prepositions
!===================!

na:na PREP ; ! "in, at, on , with"
site:site PREP ; ! "through, site" 
n'azu:n'azu ; ! "behind"
nke:nke ; ! "of"


!=================!
 LEXICON Adverbs
!=================!

Ebee:Ebee ADV ; ! "where"
agaghị:agaghị ADV ; ! "never"
mba:mba AdV ; ! "no"
n'ihu:n'ihu  Adv ; ! "front"
afọ:afọ ADV ; ! "years"
nso:nso ADV ; ! "near"
gburugburu:gburugburu ADV ; ! "around"
eleghị-anya:eleghị-anya ADV ; ! "probably"
nwayọọ-nwayọọ:nwayọọ-nwayọọ ADV ; ! "slowly"
ngwa-ngwa:ngwa-ngwa ; ! "quickly"
ka:ka ADV ; ! "still"
n'okpuru:n'okpuru ; ! "under"
ọ-bụghị:ọ-bụghị ; ! "not"
mgbe-ahụ:mgbe-ahụ ; ! "then"
mgbe:mgbe ; ! "when"
ọ-bụ:ọ-bụ ; ! "it-is"
ugbua:ugbua ; ! "now"
ọzọ:ọzọ ; ! "again"
nke-oma:nke-oma ; ! "well, carefully"
ebeahu:ebeahu ; ! "there"
nwere-ike:nwere-ike ; ! "could"
n'ebe-nile:n'ebe-nile ; ! "everywhere"
ụnyaahụ:ụnyaahụ ; ! "yesterday"
ubochita:ubochita ; ! "today"
mgbe-niile:mgbe-niile ; ! "always"
ọnụ:ọnụ ; ! "together"
ya-mere:ya-mere ; ! "so"
maka-gini:maka-gini ; ! "why"



!=================!
 LEXICON Conjuction
!=================!

na:na CNJCOO ; ! "and"
mana:mana CNJCOO ; ! "but"

ọ-bụ-ezie-na:ọ-bụ-ezie-na CNJSUB ; ! "although"

!=================!
 LEXICON Determiner
!=================!

nke-m:nke-m ; ! "my"
nke-gi:nke-gi ; ! "your, yours"
ha:ha ; ! "their"
ya:ya ; ! "her, his, him"
a:a ; ! "a"

!===============!
 LEXICON Numerals
!===============!

otu:otu NUM ; ! "1"
abụọ:abụọ NUM ; ! "2"
atö:atö NUM ; ! "3"
anö:anö NUM ; ! "4"
ise:ise NUM ; ! "5, five"
isii:isii NUM ; ! "6, six"
asaa:asaa NUM ; ! "7"
asatö:asatö NUM ; ! "8"
itolu:itolu NUM ; ! "9"
iri:iri NUM ; ! "10"
iri% na% otu:iri% na% otu NUM ; ! "11"
iri% na% atö:iri% na% atö NUM ; ! "13"
iri% abüö:iri% abüö NUM ; ! "20"
iri% abüö% na% otu:iri% abüö% na% otu NUM ; ! "21"
iri% atö:iri% atö NUM ; ! "30"
iri% atö% na% otu:iri% atö% na% otu NUM ; ! "31"
iri% asatö:iri% asatö NUM ; ! "80"
iri% itolu:iri% itolu NUM ; ! "90"
narï:narï NUM ; ! "100"
narï% abüö:narï% abüö NUM ; ! "200"
puku:puku NUM ; ! "1,000"
puku% atö% na% iri% abüö% na% iri:puku% atö% na% iri% abüö% na% iri NUM ; ! "3,210"
nde:nde NUM ; ! "1,000,000"
ijeri:ijeri NUM ; ! "1,000,000,000"
ökara:ökara NUM ; ! "1/2"



! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
